Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202614-206
City council; primary election; candidates; number.

The two candidates receiving the highest number of votes in each city council district at the primary election under section 14-201 shall be the candidates and the only candidates whose names shall be placed upon the official ballot for city council members in such city council district at the general election in such city.

Laws 1921, c. 116, art. II, § 6, p. 422;

C.S.1922, § 3531;

C.S.1929, § 14-206;

R.S.1943, § 14-206;

Laws 1979, LB 80, § 5;

Laws 1979, LB 329, § 7;

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 473;

Laws 2022, LB800, § 40;

Laws 2025, LB521, § 5.